Utah statutes.
62A-6-115.   Immunity.

A physician, assistant, or any other person acting pursuant to an order authorizing sterilization, as provided in this chapter, is not civilly or criminally liable for participation in or assistance to sterilization. This section does not apply to negligent acts committed in the performance of sterilization.

